Utah statutes.
16-10a-1530.   Grounds for revocation.
The division may commence a proceeding under Section 16-10a-1531 to revoke the
authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state if:
(1)  the foreign corporation does not deliver its annual report to the
division when it is due;
(2)  the foreign corporation does not pay when they are due any taxes, fees,
or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;
(3)  the foreign corporation is without a registered agent in this state for
30 days or more;
(4)  the foreign corporation does not inform the division by an appropriate
filing within 30 days of the change or resignation that its registered agent
has changed or that its registered agent has resigned;
(5)  an incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the foreign corporation
signs a document knowing it is false in any material respect with intent that
the document be delivered to the division for filing; or
(6)  the division receives a duly authenticated certificate from the
lieutenant governor or other official having custody of corporate records in
the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated
stating that the corporation has dissolved or disappeared as the result of a
merger.
